Hawaii statutes.
[§290-25] Effect of transfer of title.
The transfer of title and interest by sale under this part is a transfer by
operation of law; provided that if the certificate of ownership or registration
is unavailable, a bill of sale executed by an authorized seller is satisfactory
evidence authorizing the transfer of the title or interest. [L 1969, c 178, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next